Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.110

Incendiary devices—Definitions.

For the purposes of RCW 9.40.110 through 9.40.130, as now or hereafter amended, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Disposes of" means to give, give away, loan, offer, offer for sale, sell, or transfer.

(2) "Incendiary device" means any material, substance, device, or combination thereof which is capable of supplying the initial ignition and/or fuel for a fire and is designed to be used as an instrument of wilful destruction. However, no device commercially manufactured primarily for the purpose of illumination shall be deemed to be an incendiary device for purposes of this section.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 79 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 302: See note following RCW 9.41.010.